Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201087-306
Act, how cited.

Sections 87-301 to 87-306 shall be known and may be cited
as the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1969, c. 855, § 6, p. 3224;

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 14;

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 26;

Laws 2010, LB801, § 7.